Hawaii, session 2026, GM1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 46-15.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§46-15.1 Housing; county powers. (a) Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, any county shall have and may exercise
the same powers, subject to applicable limitations, as those
granted the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation
pursuant to chapter 201H insofar as those powers may be
reasonably construed to be exercisable by a county for the
purpose of developing, constructing, financing, refinancing, or
otherwise providing low- and moderate-income housing projects
and mixed-use developments; provided that no county shall be
empowered to cause the State to issue general obligation bonds
to finance a project pursuant to this section; provided further
that county projects shall be granted an exemption from general
excise or receipts taxes in the same manner as projects of the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation pursuant to
section 201H-36; provided further that county projects shall
2026-3373 HB1718 GDI HMSO

''''' H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
prioritize walkability to the extent practicable; provided
further that section 201H-16 shall not apply to this section
unless federal guidelines specifically provide local governments
with that authorization and the authorization does not conflict
with any state laws. The powers shall include the power,
subject to applicable limitations, to:
(1) Develop and construct dwelling units, alone or in
partnership with developers;
(2) Acquire necessary land by lease, purchase, exchange,
or eminent domain;
(3) Provide assistance and aid to a public agency or other
person in developing and constructing new housing and
rehabilitating existing housing for elders of low- and
moderate-income, other persons of low- and moderate­
income, and persons displaced by any governmental
action, by making long-term mortgage or interim
construction loans available;
(4) Contract with any eligible bidders to provide for
construction of urgently needed housing for persons of
low- and moderate-income;
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO 2
IIIMMIIIIIIIIIIINH

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Guarantee the top twenty-five per cent of the
principal balance of real property mortgage loans,
plus interest thereon, made to qualified borrowers by
qualified lenders;
(6) Enter into mortgage guarantee agreements with
appropriate officials of any agency or instrumentality
of the United States to induce those officials to
commit to insure or to insure mortgages under the
National Housing Act, as amended;
(7) Make a direct loan to any qualified buyer for the
downpayment required by a private lender to be made by
the borrower as a condition of obtaining a loan from
the private lender in the purchase of residential
property;
(8) Provide funds for a share, not to exceed fifty per
cent, of the principal amount of a loan made to a
qualified borrower by a private lender who is unable
otherwise to lend the borrower sufficient funds at
reasonable rates in the purchase of residential
property; and
(9) Sell or lease completed dwelling units.
2026-3373 HB1718 GDI HMSO


Page 4 H.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
For purposes of this section, a limitation is applicable to
the extent that it may reasonably be construed to apply to a
county.
(b) Each county shall recognize housing units developed by
the department of Hawaiian home lands and issue affordable
housing credits to the department of Hawaiian home lands. The
credits shall be transferable and shall be issued on a one-
credit for one-unit basis, unless the housing unit is eligible
for additional credits as provided by adopted county ordinances,
rules, or any memoranda of agreement between a county and the
department of Hawaiian home lands. In the event that credits
are transferred by the department of Hawaiian home lands,
twenty-five per cent of any monetary proceeds from the transfer
shall be used by the department of Hawaiian home lands to
develop units for rental properties. Credits shall be issued
for each single-family residence, multi-family unit, other
residential unit, whether for purposes of sale or rental, or if
allowed under the county's affordable housing programs, vacant
lot, developed by the department of Hawaiian home lands. The
credits may be applied county-wide within the same county in
which the credits were earned to satisfy affordable housing
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
obligations imposed by the county on market-priced residential
and non-residential developments. County-wide or project­
specific requirements for housing class, use, or type; or
construction time for affordable housing units shall not impair,
restrict, or condition the county's obligation to apply the
credits in full satisfaction of all county requirements, whether
by rule, ordinance, or particular zoning conditions of a
project. Notwithstanding any provisions in this section to the
contrary, the department may enter into a memorandum of
agreement with any of the counties to establish, modify, or
clarify the conditions for the issuance, transfer, and
redemption of the affordable housing credits in accordance with
county affordable housing ordinances or rules. At least half of
the affordable housing credits issued by the city and county of
Honolulu shall be subject to a memorandum of agreement pursuant
to this subsection.
(c) Each county shall recognize housing units developed
pursuant to section 201H-38 and issue affordable housing credits
to the eligible developer for residences required to be sold or
rented to individuals within a specified income range, if a
developer chooses to receive affordable housing credits.
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO
iiiniiniHMiiiiiiiii

Page 6 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Credits shall be issued for each single-family residence, multi­
family unit, other residential unit, whether for purposes of
sale, rental, or if allowed under the county's affordable
housing programs, vacant lot, developed pursuant to chapter
201H. Affordable housing credits shall not be issued if low-
income housing tax credits are utilized in conjunction with the
affordable housing developed pursuant to chapter 201H. The
credits shall be transferable and shall be issued on a one-
credit for one-unit basis, unless the housing unit is eligible
for additional credits as provided by adopted county ordinances,
rules, or any memoranda of agreement between a county and the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation. In the
event that the affordable housing credits are transferred to the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, twenty-five
per cent of any monetary proceeds from the transfer shall be
used by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation
to develop units for rental properties. The credits may be
applied county-wide within the same county in which the credits
were earned to satisfy affordable housing obligations imposed by
the county on market-priced residential and non-residential
developments. The credits may be applied to satisfy up to fifty
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiMMiiiiiian

Page 7 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
per cent of the affordable housing obligations imposed by the
county for each market-priced residential or non-residential
development, unless the county allows for more than fifty per
cent as provided by county ordinances, rules, or any memoranda
of agreement between the county and the Hawaii housing finance
and development corporation. County-wide or project-specific
requirements for housing class, use, or type, or construction
time for affordable housing units,■shall not impair, restrict,
or condition the county’s obligation to apply the credits in
full satisfaction of all county requirements, whether by rule,
ordinance, or particular zoning conditions of a project.
Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation may enter
into a memorandum of agreement with any of the counties to
establish, modify, or clarify the conditions for the issuance,
transfer, and redemption of the affordable housing credits in
accordance with county affordable housing ordinances or rules.
No affordable housing credit shall be issued under this
subsection until a certificate of occupancy has been issued.
[Prior t-e] Before the issuance of an affordable housing
credit under this subsection, an agreement, including affordable
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO
luiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiH

Page 8 H.B. NO. --
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
housing-related agreements between a county or the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation and an eligible
developer, shall be executed and include language requiring:
(1) A new and sequential identification number of at least
four digits in length for each affordable housing
credit to be issued within each county for tracking
purposes;
(2) An agreement to be recorded on title of at least one
parcel or tax map key of the originating housing
project, as defined in section 201H-1; and
(3) The prompt amendment of an agreement when an
affordable housing credit originally generated by a
housing project is sold, transferred, or utilized to
create an easily auditable trail of ownership.
(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any county
may:
(1) Authorize and issue bonds under chapter 47 and chapter
49 to provide moneys to carry out the purposes of this
section or section 46-15.2, including the satisfaction
of any guarantees made by the county pursuant to this
section;
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO

Page 9 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Appropriate moneys of the county to carry out the
purposes of this section;
(3) Obtain insurance and guarantees from the State or the
United States, or grants from either;
(4) Designate, after holding a public hearing on the
matter and with the approval of the respective
council, any lands owned by it for the purposes of
this section;
(5) Provide interim construction loans to partnerships of
which it is a partner and to developers whose projects
qualify for federally assisted project mortgage
insurance, or other similar programs of federal
assistance for persons of [iew] lo^ and [modorate
income;] moderate-income; and
(6) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as are necessary to
carry out the purposes of this section.
(e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county may
waive its right to repurchase a privately-developed affordable
housing unit built pursuant to a unilateral agreement or similar
instrument, and may transfer that right of repurchase to a
qualified nonprofit housing trust for the purpose of maintaining
2026-3373 HB1718 GDI HMSO

IllllillillliUlllllillllll

Page 10 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the unit as affordable for as long as required by the county
program.
(f) A qualified nonprofit housing trust shall report the
status and use of its housing units to its respective county by
November 30 of each calendar year.
(g) The provisions of this section shall be construed
liberally so as to effectuate the purpose of this section in
facilitating the development, construction, financing,
refinancing, or other provision of low- and moderate-income
housing projects and mixed-use developments by the various
counties.
(h) Any mixed-use development developed, constructed,
financed, refinanced, or otherwise provided by this section
shall be confined to transit-oriented developments.
(i) The authority provided under this section shall
continue to apply to any mixed-use development project for
which, before July 1, 2033, the county has obtained county
council approval or entered into a binding agreement, including
a purchase agreement, pre-development agreement, development
agreement, or ground lease, committing the county to the
acquisition or development of the property for mixed-use
2026-3373 HB1718 GDI HMSO

Page 11 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
development. Any such project shall be deemed vested and may
proceed to completion notwithstanding any subsequent repeal or
modification of the authority provided under this section.
[(h)] (j) For purposes of this section:
"Affordable housing obligation" means the requirement
imposed by a county, regardless of the date of its imposition,
to develop vacant lots, single-family residences, multi-family
residences, or any other type of residence for sale or rent to
individuals within a specified income range.
"Eligible developer" has the same meaning as [defined] in
section 201H-32.
"Low- and moderate-income housing project" means any
housing project that meets the definition of "low- and moderate­
income housing project" in section 39A-281.
"Mixed-use development" has the same meaning as [defined]
in section 201H-12(a).
"Qualified nonprofit housing trust" means a corporation,
association, or other duly chartered organization that:
(1) Is registered and in good standing with the State;
(2) Is recognized by the Internal Revenue Service as a
charitable or otherwise tax-exempt organization under
2026-3373 HB1718 GDI HMSO 1
Miiiinniiiiiiiiiim

Page 12 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended; and
(3) Has the capacity, resources, and mission to carry out
the purposes of this section as determined by the
county in which the housing unit is located."
SECTION 2. Act 45, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended
by amending section 4 to read as follows:
"SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval,
and shall apply to bond proceeds expended by a county after
December 31, 2023 [7—and shall be- repcalod on Juno 30/—2-0-28;
provi-dod tha-t--s-e&t-ion 46-15.1,—Hawaii Revised Sfea-t-utos/—shall be
^eefiarebed—ift—bhe—ift—whieh—ih—3?ead—©ft—the—day-^e-fe^e-^fehe
date—©f—this-Tietr^]; provided that the amendments made
to section 46-15.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 2 of
this Act shall only apply to bonds originally issued before July
1, 2033, and shall not be repealed when that section is
reenacted on:
(1) July 1, 2030, pursuant to:
(A) Section 3 of Act 141, Session Laws of Hawaii
2009, as amended by section 3 of Act 102, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2015, as amended by section 1 of
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO 12

Page 13 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Act 80, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019, as amended
by section 2 of Act 90, Session Laws of Hawaii
2023; and
(B) Section 3 of Act 98, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012,
as amended by section 4 of Act 102, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2015, as amended by section 50 of Act
55, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, as amended by
section 2 of Act 80, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019,
as amended by section 3 of Act 90, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2023; and
(2) July 1, 2031, pursuant to section 4 of Act 31, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2024."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that the amendments made to section 46-15.1, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, by section 1 of this Act shall not be repealed
when that section is reenacted on:
(1) July 1, 2030, pursuant to:
(A) Section 3 of Act 141, Session Laws of Hawaii
2009, as amended by section 3 of Act 102, Session
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO 13
iiiiiiiiiniiiniiiiinii

Page 14 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Laws of Hawaii 2015, as amended by section 1 of
Act 80, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019, as amended
by section 2 of Act 90, Session Laws of Hawaii
2023; and
(B) Section 3 of Act 98, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012,
as amended by section 4 of Act 102, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2015, as amended by section 50 of Act
55, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, as amended by
section 2 of Act 80, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019,
as amended by section 3 of Act 90, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2023; and
(2) July 1, 2031, pursuant to section 4 of Act 31, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2024.
2026-3373 HB1718 CDl HMSO

iiiininnniniinniin^

H.B. NO.
' • s D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1718, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1718, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
117-26